Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-27,142.01
Incorporated
municipalities; sales and use tax; modification; election required, when.

(1) The governing body of any incorporated municipality may
submit the question of changing any terms and conditions of a sales and use
tax previously authorized under section 77-27,142. Except as otherwise provided
by section 77-27,142, the question of modification shall be submitted to the
voters at any primary or general election or at a special election if the
governing body submits a certified copy of the resolution proposing modification
to the election commissioner or county clerk within the time prior to the
primary, general, or special election prescribed in section 77-27,142.02.

(2) If the change imposes a sales and use tax at a rate greater
than one and one-half percent or increases the sales and use tax to a rate
greater than one and one-half percent, the question shall include, but not
be limited to:

(a) The percentage increase of one-quarter percent or one-half
percent in the sales and use tax rate;

(b) A list of reductions or elimination of other taxes or
fees, if any;

(c) A description of the projects to be funded, in whole or
in part, from the revenue collected, along with any savings or efficiencies
resulting from the projects;

(d) The year or years within which the revenue will be collected
and, if bonds will be issued with some or all of the revenue pledged for payment
of such bonds, a statement that the revenue will be collected until the payment
in full of such bonds and any refunding bonds; and

(e)(i) The percentage of revenue collected to be used for
the purposes of the interlocal agreement or joint public agency agreement
as provided in subdivision (2)(b)(i) or subsection (3)
of section 77-27,142; (ii) a statement of the overall purpose of the agreement
which is the long-term development of unified governance of public infrastructure
projects, if applicable; and (iii) the name of any other political subdivision
which is a party to the agreement.

This subsection does not apply to the first one and one-half
percent of a sales and use tax imposed by a municipality.

Laws 1978, LB 394, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 182A, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB501, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB357, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB104, § 2.